Rhode Island, session 2025, SB648.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 5-25 of the General Laws entitled "Veterinary Practice" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-25-7.2. Veterinarian drug consultation.
(a) Each time a veterinarian initially prescribes, dispenses, or furnishes a drug to an animal
patient in an outpatient setting, the veterinarian shall offer to provide, verbally, in writing, or by
email to the client, a consultation that includes the following information:
(1) The name and description of the drug;
(2) Route of administration, dosage form, dosage, duration of drug therapy, the duration of
the effects of the drug, and the common severe adverse effects associated with the use of a short-
acting or long-acting drug;
(3) Any special directions for proper use and storage;
(4) Actions to be taken in the event of a missed dose; and
(5) If available, precautions and relevant warnings provided by the drug's manufacturer,
including common severe adverse effects of the drug.
(b) If available by drug manufacturer, a veterinarian must provide a client information sheet
to pet owners when prescribing medications.
(c) A veterinarian may delegate to a registered veterinary technician or veterinary assistant
the task of providing consultation and drug documentation required by this section.
(d) It shall be noted in the medical record of the animal patient if the consultation described

in this section is provided or declined by the client.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC002268
========
LC002268 - Page 2 of 3